Testing/testScripts/out.aff
SET UTF-8                
SFX  NounS  Y  3         
SFX  NounS  0  es  [x]   
SFX  NounS  0  s  [ge]   
SFX  NounS  y  ies  [y]  
SFX  Verb2S  Y  3        
SFX  Verb2S  0  ning  [n]
SFX  Verb2S  0  s  [n]   
SFX  Verb2S  un  an  [n] 
